Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1,108
Animal Research and Diagnosis Revolving Fund; how funded.

Fees for diagnostic and testing services performed for individuals, corporations, and agencies of government shall be paid into the Animal Research and Diagnosis Revolving Fund.

Laws 1976, LB 869, § 3.